Wyoming statutes. Title 35 Public Health and Safety
Article 1. In General

§§ 35-7-101 through 35-7-108.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1987, ch. 173, § 4.

Editor's notes. —

These sections, which derived from Laws 1911, ch. 104, §§ 7, 11, 17, and 19, Laws 1913, ch. 107, §§ 5 and 6, and Laws 1921, ch. 80, §§ 1 and 2, related to general provisions on food and drugs.

§ 35-7-109.
Short title.

This act may be cited as the “Wyoming Food, Drug and Cosmetic Safety Act”.

History.

Laws 1987, ch. 173, § 1; 2000, ch. 37, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2000, ch. 37, § 5, provides that it is the intention of the Wyoming legislature to create a food safety system that is based on partnership between state and local agencies, the University of Wyoming, consumers and all levels of the food industry.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “This act,” referred to in this section, see § 35-7-110(a)(xxxi).

§
35-7-110.
Definitions.

As used in this act:

“Advertisement” means all representations disseminated in any manner or by any means, other than by labeling, for the purpose of inducing the purchase of food, drugs, devices or cosmetics;

“Color” includes black, white and intermediate grays;

“Color additive” means a material, other than a material exempt under the federal act, which:

Is a dye, pigment or other substance from a vegetable, animal, mineral or other source; or

When added or applied to a food, drug or cosmetic, or to the human body or any part thereof, is capable (alone or through reaction with other substance) of imparting color thereto.

“Consumer commodity” means any food, drug, device or cosmetic as those terms are defined by this act or by the federal act;

“Cosmetic” means articles other than soap which are:

Intended to be rubbed, poured, sprinkled or sprayed on, introduced into, or otherwise applied to the human body or any part thereof for cleansing, beautifying, promoting attractiveness or altering the appearance; and

Intended for use as a component of any articles under subparagraph (A) of this paragraph.

“Counterfeit drug” means a drug which, or the container or labeling of which, without authorization, bears the trademark, trade name or other identifying mark, imprint or device, or any likeness therefor, of a drug manufacturer, processor, packer or distributor other than the person who in fact manufactured, processed, packed or distributed the drug and which thereby falsely purports or is represented to be the product of, or to have been packed or distributed by, the other drug manufacturer, processor, packer or distributor;

“Department” means the department of agriculture;

“Device” means instruments, apparatus and contrivances, including their components, parts and accessories, intended:

For use in the diagnosis, cure, mitigation, treatment or prevention of disease in man or other animals; or

To affect the structure or any function of the body of man or other animals.

“Director” means the director of the Wyoming department of agriculture or his duly authorized representative;

“Drug” means:

Articles recognized in the official United States pharmacopoeia, official homeopathic pharmacopoeia of the United States, official national formulary or any supplement to any of them; and

Articles intended for use in the diagnosis, cure, mitigation, treatment or prevention of disease in man or other animals; and

Articles (other than food) intended to affect the structure or any function of the body of man or other animals; and

Articles intended for use as a component of any article specified in subparagraph (A), (B) or (C) of this paragraph but does not include devices or their components, parts or accessories.

“Establishment” means and includes any place or any area of any establishment in which foods, drugs, devices and cosmetics are displayed for sale, manufactured, processed, packed, held or stored. “Establishment” does not include a home kitchen where food is prepared and stored for family consumption, or any other place equipped for the preparation, consumption and storage of food on the premise by employees or nonpaying guests;

“Federal act” means the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act, as amended, (Title 21 U.S.C. § 301 et seq.) and regulations promulgated under the act;

“Food” means:

Articles used for food or drink for humans including meat and ice intended for human consumption;

Chewing gum;

Beverages subject to the Federal Alcohol Administration Act, as amended, (Title 27 U.S.C. § 201 et seq.);

Articles used for components of any article under subparagraphs (A), (B) and (C) of this paragraph.

“Food additive” means any substance the intended use of which results or may be reasonably expected to result, directly or indirectly, in its becoming a component or otherwise affecting the characteristics of any food within the meaning of the federal act;

An “imitation food” is any food which is in physical characteristics such as taste, flavor, color, texture or appearance which resembles or purports to be or is represented as a food for which a definition and standard of identity has been prescribed and does not conform to such standard;

“Immediate container” does not include package liners;

“Label” means a display of written, printed or graphic matter upon the immediate container of any article. A requirement made by or under this act that any word, statement or other information appear on the label shall not be considered to be complied with unless the word, statement or other information also appears on the outside container or wrapper, if there is any, of the retail package of the article, or is easily legible through the outside container or wrapper;

“Labeling” means all labels and other written, printed or graphic matter upon an article or any of its containers or wrappers, or accompanying the article;

“Local board of health” means a county or city board of health established pursuant to W.S.

35-1-301

et seq.;

“Local health department” means a health department established by a county, municipality or district pursuant to W.S.

35-1-301

et seq.;

“New drug” means any drug considered to be a new drug under the federal act;

“Official compendium” means the official United States pharmacopoeia, official homeopathic pharmacopoeia of the United States, official national formulary or any supplement to any of them;

“Package” means any container or wrapping in which any consumer commodity is enclosed for use in the delivery or display of that consumer commodity to retail purchasers as interpreted by the federal act;

“Pesticide chemical” means any substance which, alone, in chemical combination, or in formulation with one (1) or more other substances is an “economic poison” within the meaning of the Federal Insecticide, Fungicide and Rodenticide Act (7 U.S.C. §§ 136 through 136y) which is used in the production, storage or transportation of raw agricultural commodities;

“Principal display panel” means that part of a label that is most likely to be displayed, presented, shown or examined under normal and customary conditions of display for retail sale;

“Raw agricultural commodity” means any food in its raw or natural state, including all fruits that are washed, colored or otherwise treated in their unpeeled natural form prior to marketing;

“Regulatory authority” means the authority which issued the license or promulgated the rule or regulation being enforced including the department of agriculture or local health department;

“Farmers market” means a common facility or area where several vendors may gather on a regular, recurring basis to sell a variety of fresh fruits and vegetables, locally grown farm products and other items directly to consumers;

“Function” means any official ceremony or organized social occasion;

“Not potentially hazardous food” means any food which does not require time or temperature control for safety to limit pathogenic microorganism growth or toxin formation. The natural pH or the final pH of acidified food must be 4.6 or less;

“Commercial food establishment” means and includes any place or any area of any establishment that is a wholesale or retail business where foods, drugs, devices and cosmetics are displayed for sale, manufactured, processed, packed, held or stored. “Commercial food establishment” shall not include:

Any farmers market;

Any producer or informed consumer engaged in transactions pursuant to W.S.

11-49-103

; or

Any retail space selling homemade food that is separate from a commercial food establishment in accordance with rules and regulations adopted by the department pursuant to W.S.

11-49-103

(d).

“This act” means W.S.

35-7-109

through

35-7-126

.

History.

Laws 1987, ch. 173, § 1; 1993, ch. 191, § 3; 2000, ch. 37, § 2; 2009, ch. 77, § 1; 2011, ch. 153, § 2; 2015 ch. 121, § 2, effective March 3, 2015; 2017 ch. 56, § 1, effective July 1, 2017; 2022 ch. 55, § 1, effective July 1, 2022.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, added (a)(xxviii) through (a)(xxx) and made a related change.

The 2011 amendment,

in (a)(xi), added the present last sentence.

Laws 2011, ch. 153, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2011.

The 2015 amendment,

added
present (a)(xxxi), and redesignated former (a)(xxxi) as (a)xxxii).

Laws 2015, ch. 121, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2015.

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, added (a)(xxxi)(C), and made related changes.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, substituted “35-7-126” for “35-7-127” in (a)(xxxii).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Legislative definition. —

Where legislature has specifically defined what constitutes adulteration within statute prohibiting manufacture or sale of adulterated foods, court is bound to follow that definition. State v. Weeden, 17 Wyo. 418, 100 P. 114,

1909 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(Wyo. 1909).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

What is a “drug,” a “device,” and a “new drug” within the definitions of these terms in § 201 (g)(1), (h), and (p) of the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act as amendment (21 U.S.C. § 321 (g)(1), (h), and (p)), 3 ALR Fed 843.

What is “drug” within meaning of § 201(g)(1) of Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act (21 USC § 321(g)(1)), 127 ALR Fed 141.

What is “device” within meaning of § 201(h) of Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act (21 USCS § 321(h)), 129 ALR Fed 343.

§ 35-7-111.
Prohibited acts.

No person shall:

Violate this act or any rules promulgated under it;

Introduce or deliver for introduction into commerce of any food, drug, device or cosmetic that is adulterated or misbranded;

Adulterate or misbrand any food, drug, device or cosmetic in commerce;

Knowingly receive in commerce of any food, drug, device or cosmetic that is adulterated or misbranded;

Refuse to permit entry, inspection or access to records as authorized by this act;

Manufacture any food, drug, device or cosmetic that is adulterated or misbranded;

Give a false guaranty or undertaking under this act except by a person who relied upon a guaranty or undertaking to the same effect signed by, and containing the name and address of, the person residing in the United States from whom he received in good faith the food, drug, device or cosmetic;

Forge, counterfeit or without proper authority use any mark, stamp, tag, label or other identification device authorized or required by regulations promulgated under this act;

Make, sell or possess any punch, die, plate, stone, or other thing designed to print, imprint or reproduce the trademark, trade name or other identifying mark, imprint or device of another or any likeness of any of the foregoing upon any drug or container or labeling thereof so as to render such drugs a counterfeit drug;

Alter, mutilate, destroy, obliterate or remove any part of the labeling of, or the doing of any other act with respect to a food, drug, device or cosmetic, if done while the article is held for sale (whether or not the first sale) after shipment in commerce and which results in the article being adulterated or misbranded;

Repealed by Laws 2000, ch. 37, § 4.

Use in labeling, advertising or other sales promotion of any reference to any report or analysis furnished by the director in compliance with this act;

Include the term “meat” or any synonymous term for meat or a specific animal species in labeling, advertising or other sales promotion unless the product:

Is consistent with the definition of meat in W.S. 35-7-119(e)(iii)(A); and

Is derived from harvested livestock, poultry, wildlife or exotic livestock as those terms are defined in W.S. 11-26-101(a), 11-32-101(a)(iv), 23-1-101(a)(xiii) and 23-1-102(a)(xvi).

No person shall remove or dispose of a detained or embargoed article in violation of W.S.

35-7-114

.

In determining whether labeling or an advertisement is misleading under this act, the following shall be considered:

Representations made or suggested by statement, word, design, device, sound or in any combination thereof;

The extent to which the labeling or advertisement fails to reveal facts material in the light of the representations or facts material with respect to consequences which may result from the use of the article to which the labeling or advertisement relates under the conditions of use prescribed in the labeling or advertisement or under conditions of use as are customary or usual.

History.

Laws 1987, ch. 173, § 1; 1993, ch. 191, § 3; 2000, ch. 37, § 4; 2019 ch. 100, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, added (a)(xiii).

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 35-7-110(a)(xxxi).

Legislative definition. —

Where legislature has specifically defined what constitutes adulteration within statute prohibiting manufacture or sale of adulterated foods, court is bound to follow that definition. State v. Weeden, 17 Wyo. 418, 100 P. 114,

1909 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(Wyo. 1909).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

What is “device” within meaning of § 201(h) of Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act (21 USCS § 321(h)), 129 ALR Fed 343.

§ 35-7-112.
Cease operations order; injunction proceedings.

If the director or the director of the department of health pursuant to W.S. 35-7-123(b)(vi) has probable cause to believe that an imminent hazard to the public health exists from a violation of this act, he may order any person to immediately cease the practice believed to be a violation and shall provide the person an opportunity for a hearing pursuant to the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act within ten (10) days after issuing the order.

In addition to any other remedies, the director may apply to the district court for injunctive relief from any person who violates W.S.

35-7-111

.

History.

Laws 1987, ch. 173, § 1; 1993, ch. 191, § 3; 2000, ch. 37, § 2.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 35-7-110(a)(xxxi).

Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. —

See § 16-3-101(a), (b)(xi).

Cross references. —

As to injunctions, see Rule 65, W.R.C.P.

§ 35-7-113.
Penalties and guaranty.

Any person who knowingly and intentionally violates W.S.

35-7-111

is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than six (6) months, a fine of not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00), or both. Upon a subsequent conviction under W.S.

35-7-111

, the person may be punished by imprisonment for not more than one (1) year, a fine of not more than one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500.00), or both.

No person may be convicted under W.S.

35-7-111

if he established a guaranty or undertaking signed by, and containing the name and address of, the person from whom he received the article in good faith, to the effect that the article is not adulterated or misbranded within the meaning of this act and if he furnishes on request of the director the name and address of the person from whom he purchased or received the article in good faith and copies of all documents pertaining to the delivery of the article to him.

No publisher, radio-broadcast licensee, or agency or medium for the dissemination of an advertisement, except the manufacturer, packer, distributor or seller of the article to which a false advertisement relates, may be punished under W.S.

35-7-111

for the dissemination of the false advertisement.

History.

Laws 1987, ch. 173, § 1; 1993, ch. 191, § 3.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 35-7-110(a)(xxxi).

§ 35-7-114.
Embargo.

If the director has probable cause to believe that any food, drug, device, cosmetic or consumer commodity is adulterated or so misbranded as to be dangerous or fraudulent, within the meaning of this act, he shall affix a tag or other appropriate marking to the article giving notice that the article is or is suspected of being adulterated or misbranded and has been embargoed. The director shall release all other articles.

If the director finds an article embargoed under subsection (a) of this section to be adulterated or misbranded, the director may immediately petition the district court for the county in which the article is embargoed to condemn the article, otherwise the tag or other marking shall be removed by the director or his agent.

If the court finds that an embargoed article is adulterated or misbranded, the article, after entry of the decree, shall be destroyed at the owner’s expense, under the supervision of the director or his agent. All court costs and fees, transportation costs, and storage and other proper expenses, shall be taxed against the owner of the article or his agent unless the adulteration or misbranding can be corrected by proper labeling or processing of the article. If so, the court, after entry of the decree and after costs, fees and expenses have been paid and a good and sufficient bond, conditioned that the article shall be correctly labeled or processed, has been executed, may by order direct delivery of the article to the owner for labeling or processing under the supervision of the director. The expense of supervision shall be paid by the owner. The article shall be returned to the owner and the bond shall be discharged on the representation to the court by the director that the article is no longer in violation of this act and that the expenses of supervision have been paid. Nothing in this section prevents the director from authorizing the owner of an adulterated or misbranded article from destroying it as the director prescribes.

History.

Laws 1987, ch. 173, § 1; 1993, ch. 191, § 3.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 35-7-110(a)(xxxi).

§ 35-7-115.
Food; definitions and standards.

Definitions and standards of identity, quality and fill of container under the federal act or its regulations are the definitions and standards of identity, quality and fill of container in this state. However, when the action will promote honesty and fair dealing in the interest of consumers, the director may promulgate regulations establishing definitions and standards of identity, quality and fill of container for foods where no federal regulations exist. In addition, the director may promulgate amendments to any federal or state regulations which set definitions and standards of identity, and may promulgate amendments to any federal or state regulations which set standards of quality and fill of container for foods.

Temporary permits now or hereafter granted for interstate shipment of experimental packs of food under the federal act are automatically effective in this state.

History.

Laws 1987, ch. 173, § 1; 1993, ch. 191, § 3; 2000, ch. 37, § 2; 2022 ch. 55, § 1, effective July 1, 2022.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, deleted “in conjunction with W.S.

35-7-127

,” following “In addition” in (a).

Meaning of “federal act.” —

For the definition of “federal act,” referred to in this section, see § 35-7-110(a)(xii).

§ 35-7-116.
Food, drugs and cosmetics; adulteration and misbranding.

A food, cosmetic or a drug or device is adulterated if it is adulterated under the federal act. A food, cosmetic or a drug or device is misbranded if it is misbranded under the federal act.

History.

Laws 1987, ch. 173, § 1.

Meaning of “federal act.” —

For the definition of “federal act,” referred to in this section, see 35-7-110(a)(xii).

§ 35-7-117.
Food; tolerances for added poisonous ingredients.

Any added poisonous or deleterious substance, any food additive, any pesticide chemical in or on a raw agricultural commodity or any color additive, is unsafe with respect to any particular use or intended use if it is deemed unsafe under section 406 of the federal act [21 U.S.C. § 346].

History.

Laws 1987, ch. 173, § 1.

Meaning of “federal act.” —

For the definition of “federal act,” referred to in this section, see § 35-7-110(a)(xii). Section 406 of the act appears as 21 U.S.C. § 346.

§ 35-7-118.
New drugs.

No person shall sell, offer for sale, hold for sale or give away any new drug unless an application with respect thereto has been approved and the approval has not been withdrawn under section 505 of the federal act.

This section does not apply to a drug intended solely for investigational use by physicians pursuant to W.S. 35-7-1802(a)(i)(C).

History.

Laws 1987, ch. 173, § 1; 2015 ch. 174, § 2, effective July 1, 2015.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, added (b).

Meaning of “federal act.” —

For the definition of “federal act,” referred to in this section, see § 35-7-110(a)(xii). Section 505 of the act appears as 21 U.S.C. § 355.

§ 35-7-119.
Fair packaging and labeling provisions.

All labels of consumer commodities, as defined by this act, shall conform with the requirements for the declaration of net quantity of contents of section 4 of the Fair Packaging and Labeling Act (15 U.S.C. § 1451, et seq.) and the regulations promulgated pursuant thereto as of the effective date of this act. Consumer commodities exempted from the requirements of section 4 of the Fair Packaging and Labeling Act are also exempt from this subsection.

The label of any package of a consumer commodity which bears a representation as to the number of servings of the commodity contained in the package shall bear a statement of the net quantity (in terms of weight, measure or numerical count) of each serving.

No person shall distribute or cause to be distributed in commerce any packaged consumer commodity if any qualifying words or phrases appear in conjunction with the separate statement of the net quantity of contents required by subsection (a) of this section, but nothing in this section prohibits supplemental statements, at other places on the package, describing in nondeceptive terms the net quantity of contents. Supplemental statements of net quantity of contents shall not include any term qualifying a unit of weight, measure or count that tends to exaggerate the amount of the commodity contained in the package.

If the director determines that regulations containing prohibitions or requirements other than those prescribed by subsection (a) of this section are necessary to prevent the deception of consumer or to facilitate value comparisons as to any consumer commodity, the director shall promulgate rules and regulations with respect to that commodity.

The department shall promulgate rules with respect to labeling. Every retailer and every wholesaler who sells or offers for sale in this state through an establishment or otherwise any:

Meat that is the product of any country foreign to the United States, shall clearly label the meat as “imported,” naming the country of its origin;

Cell cultured or plant based products not consistent with the definition of meat in subparagraph (iii)(A) of this subsection and not derived from harvested livestock, poultry, wildlife or exotic livestock as those terms are defined in W.S. 11-26-101(a), 11-32-101(a)(iv), 23-1-101(a)(xiii) and 23-1-102(a)(xvi), shall clearly label cell cultured products as “containing cell cultured product” and clearly label plant based products as “vegetarian”, “veggie”, “vegan”, “plant based” or other similar term indicating that the product is plant based;

As used in this subsection:

“Meat” means the edible part of the muscle of animals, which is skeletal or which is found in the tongue, in the diaphragm, in the heart or in the esophagus, with or without the accompanying or overlying fat, and the portions of bone, skin, sinew, nerve and blood vessels which normally accompany the muscle tissue and which are not separated from it in the process of dressing, but shall not include the muscle found in the lips, snout or ears, nor any edible part of the muscle which has been manufactured, cured, smoked, cooked or processed;

“Retailer” means a person regularly engaged in the business of selling meat at retail to the public, and selling only to the user or consumer and not for resale;

“Wholesaler” means a person regularly engaged in the business of selling meat at wholesale to retailers for subsequent sale at retail to the public.

Subsections (a) and (c) of this section shall not apply to the preparation, service, use, consumption or storage of foods at a traditional event or activity pursuant to W.S.

35-7-1703

. The definitions in W.S.

35-7-1702

shall apply to this subsection.

History.

Laws 1987, ch. 173, § 1; 1993, ch. 191, § 3; 2000, ch. 37, § 2; 2011, ch. 153, § 2; 2019 ch. 100, § 1, effective July 1, 2020; 2022 ch. 55, § 1, effective July 1, 2022.

The 2011 amendment,

added (f).

Laws 2011, ch. 153, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2011.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, in the introductory language in (e), added the first sentence, designated (e)(i), in (e)(i), substituted “Meat that” for “meat, which,” and deleted “The department shall promulgate rules and regulations with respect to labeling,” added (e)(ii), added (e)(iii) designation, and redesignated former (e)(i) through (e)(iii) as (e)(iii)(A) through (e)(iii)(C), and made related changes.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, deleted “in conjunction with W.S.

35-7-127

” at the end of (d).

Fair Packaging and Labeling Act. —

Section 4 of the federal Fair Packaging and Labeling Act, referred to in this section, appears as 15 U.S.C. § 1453.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 35-7-110(a)(xxxi).

§ 35-7-120.
Regulations.

The director may promulgate regulations necessary for the efficient enforcement of this act.

The director may promulgate regulations necessary to ensure that appropriate sanitary conditions and water quality standards are met by any person engaged in the distribution of bulk quantities of water for sale for human consumption.

History.

Laws 1987, ch. 173, § 1; 1989, ch. 60, § 1; 1993, ch. 191, § 3; 2000, ch. 37, § 2.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 35-7-110(a)(xxxi).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Federal preemption of state common-law products liability claims pertaining to drugs, medical devices and other health-related items, 98 ALR Fed 124.

§ 35-7-121.
Inspections; examinations.

For purposes of enforcement of this act, the director or a local health department official may, upon presenting appropriate credentials to the owner, operator or agent in charge:

Enter at reasonable time any factory, warehouse or establishment in which food, drugs, devices or cosmetics are manufactured, processed or packed or held for introduction into commerce or after introduction or to enter any vehicle being used to transport or hold the food, drugs, devices or cosmetics in commerce; and

Inspect at any reasonable times and within reasonable limits and in a reasonable manner any factory, warehouse, establishment or vehicle and all pertinent equipment, finished and unfinished materials, containers and labeling therein, and to obtain samples necessary to the enforcement of this act, except that paragraph (i) of this subsection and this paragraph do not permit the director to inspect any establishment solely because it holds prepackaged food, drugs or cosmetics for retail sale by that establishment. The frequency of inspections shall be based on the relative food safety risk that the factory, warehouse, establishment or vehicle presents to the public, with no such facility receiving less than one (1) inspection per year;

Have access to and to copy all records of carriers in commerce showing the movement in commerce of any food, drugs, devices or cosmetics, or holding thereof during or after movement, and the quantity, shipper and consignee thereof.

Upon completion of any inspection under this section but before leaving the premises, the director shall give to the owner, operator or agent in charge a report in writing setting forth any conditions or practices observed by him which in his judgment indicate that any food, drug, device or cosmetic in the establishment:

Consists in whole or in part of any filthy, putrid or decomposed substance; or

Have been prepared, packed or held under unsanitary conditions whereby it may have become contaminated with filth or whereby it may have been rendered injurious to health. A copy of the report shall be sent promptly to the director.

If the director obtains any sample during an inspection under this section, he shall give to the owner, operator or agent in charge a receipt describing the samples obtained before leaving the premises.

If the director obtains a sample of any food during an inspection under this section and an analysis is made of the sample, a copy of the results of the analysis shall be furnished promptly to the owner, operator or agent in charge.

Repealed by Laws 2000, ch. 37, § 4.

Any person conducting an inspection of an establishment for the department or any local health department shall demonstrate their qualifications by being a Wyoming or nationally registered environmental health specialist or sanitarian, a registered food safety specialist or hold an in-training status and be working toward registration, be standardized by the federal food and drug administration or meet qualifications set forth by the director. Only a registered environmental health specialist or a registered food safety specialist shall be authorized to recommend the summary suspension of an establishment license by a regulatory authority pursuant to W.S.

35-7-125

.

Any inspector hired by a regulatory authority prior to July 1, 2000, shall have two (2) years from July 1, 2000 to meet the qualifications set forth in subsection (f) of this section. Any inspector hired by a regulatory authority after July 1, 2000, shall have one (1) year to meet the qualifications set forth in subsection (f) of this section.

Subsection (a) of this section shall not apply to food prepared for, served, consumed, stored or sold at a traditional event or activity pursuant to W.S.

35-7-1703

. The definitions in W.S.

35-7-1702

shall apply to this subsection.

History.

Laws 1987, ch. 173, § 1; 1993, ch. 191, § 3; 2000, ch. 37, §§ 2, 4; 2011, ch. 153, § 2; 2022 ch. 55, § 1, effective July 1, 2022.

The 2011 amendment,

added (h).

Laws 2011, ch. 153, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2011.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, deleted “in conjunction with the food safety council” at the end of the first sentence of (f).

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 35-7-110(a)(xxxi).

§ 35-7-122.
Publicity.

The director may cause to be published from time to time reports summarizing all judgments, decrees and court orders which have been rendered under this act, including the nature of the charge and the disposition thereof.

The director may also cause to be disseminated any information regarding food, drugs, devices and cosmetics as the director deems necessary in the interest of public health and the protection of the consumer against fraud. Nothing in this section prohibits the director from collecting, reporting and illustrating the results of his investigations, except that the director shall not disclose any information acquired under this act such as customer lists, manufacturing volumes and information concerning any method or process which as a trade secret is entitled to protection.

History.

Laws 1987, ch. 173, § 1; 1993, ch. 191, § 3.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 35-7-110(a)(xxxi).

Savings clauses. —

Laws 1987, ch. 173, § 3, provides: “Buildings, facilities and equipment in use before the effective date of this act, or new buildings, facilities or equipment for which contractual obligations are incurred before the effective date of this act, and which do not meet all of the requirements of this act or any regulations promulgated pursuant thereto, are not in violation of this act if they are in good repair and capable of being maintained in a sanitary condition.”